Massachusetts, session 194th, S1338.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 151A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following
subsection:-
(b) such service is performed outside the usual course of the business of the employer;
and
of 1